District of Columbia statutes.
16-2337

Additional powers of the Director of Social Services.

In addition to the powers and duties prescribed in section 11-1722 , the Director of Social Services shall have power to take into custody and place in detention or shelter care, in accordance with this subchapter, children who are under his supervision as delinquent or in need of supervision, children on probation and under the Director’s supervision, when the Director has reasonable cause to believe they have violated one or more conditions of their probation, or children who have run away from agencies or institutions to which they were committed under this subchapter.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 543, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 121(a)
Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title IV, § 408(a), 24 DCR 3341
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-258, § 2(b), 46 DCR 1314
Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-277, § 3(a)(8), 48 DCR 2043
This section is referenced in § 16-2309.
1981 Ed., § 16-2337.
1973 Ed., § 16-2337.
D.C. Law 13-277 substituted “or” for “,” following “delinquent”.